North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-02 Game and Fish Department
20.1-02-17.1.
Procedures and conditions for land acquisitions for wildlife and fish restoration.

The director shall submit proposed wildlife and fish restoration programs or projects and updated segments thereof involving proposed acquisitions by purchase, lease, easement, or servitude of wetlands, water, or land areas by certified mail with return receipt to the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the affected areas are located for the board’s approval prior to agreement with and approval by the secretary of the interior.

The board of county commissioners of the county affected, or a designee or designees of the board, shall, within twenty-one days of receipt of an acquisition proposal, physically inspect the proposed acquisition areas. The board shall give public notice of the date, hour, and place where the public may comment on the proposed acquisitions. The notice must be published once each week for two consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the county or counties in which the land and water areas are located. The notice must set forth the substance of the proposed action and must include a legal description of the proposed acquisitions. The board of county commissioners shall give its approval or disapproval by certified mail with return receipt within sixty days after receipt of an acquisition proposal.

A detailed impact analysis from the state game and fish department shall be included with the acquisition proposal for board of county commissioner consideration in making recommendations. The analysis by the game and fish department shall include, but shall not be limited to, the recreational and wildlife impacts. In addition, the county agent of the affected county or counties shall prepare an impact analysis for board of county commissioner consideration which shall include the fiscal, social, and agricultural impacts of the proposed acquisition. The state game and fish department shall reimburse the county or counties for any expenses incurred by the county agent in preparing the analysis. The analyses shall also be forwarded to the department of commerce division of community services which shall furnish copies to all interested state agencies and political subdivisions, which agencies and political subdivisions shall have thirty days to review the analyses and return their comments to the division of community services. Upon expiration of the thirty-day period, all comments received by the division of community services shall be forwarded to the state game and fish department. The state game and fish department may, after consideration of such comments, file a final impact analysis with the division of community services and the board of county commissioners.

Any landowner may negotiate the time period of a lease, easement, or servitude sought under the federal Acts cited in section 20.1-02-17. Except with respect to flowage and access easements, a lease, easement, or servitude shall terminate upon the death of a landowner or upon change in ownership of the affected land.

A landowner may restrict a lease, easement, or servitude by legal description to the wetlands, water, or land areas sought under the Acts and may drain any expanded wetland or water area in excess of the legal description.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 203, § 2; 1979, ch. 553, § 10; 1983, ch. 570, § 5; 1989, ch. 279, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 28; 1999, ch. 475, § 1; 2001, ch. 488, § 8.

20.1-02-17.2.
Lands acquired by game and fish department to qualify as Garrison diversion mitigation lands. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 274, § 4.

20.1-02-18.
State’s conditional consent to United States’ acquisition of areas for migratory bird reservations — State retains jurisdiction.

North Dakota consents, subject to the approval of the governor for each proposed acquisition, along with the conditions of sections 20.1-02-18.1 and 20.1-02-18.2, to the United States acquiring, by purchase, gift, devise, or lease, land or water in this state as the United States may deem necessary to establish migratory bird reservations in accordance with the federal Migratory Bird Conservation Act [Pub. L. 70-770; 45 Stat. 1222; 16 U.S.C. 715 et seq.]. North Dakota reserves such full and complete jurisdiction and authority over all such areas of land or water so acquired by the United States as is not incompatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control of such areas by the United States under the terms of said Act of Congress.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1977, ch. 204, § 1; 1985, ch. 274, § 1.

20.1-02-18.1.
Federal wildlife area acquisitions — Submission to county commissioners, opportunity for public comment, and impact analysis required.

The governor, the director, or their designees, responsible under federal law for final approval of land, wetland, and water acquisitions by the United States department of the interior, its bureaus or agencies, for waterfowl production areas, wildlife refuges, or other wildlife or waterfowl purposes, shall submit the proposed acquisitions by certified mail with return receipt to the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the land, wetland, and water areas are located for the board’s recommendations.

The board of county commissioners of the county affected, or a designee or designees of the board, shall, within twenty-one days of receipt of an acquisition proposal, physically inspect the proposed acquisition areas. The board shall give public notice of the date, hour, and place where the public may comment on the proposed acquisitions. The notice must be published once each week for two successive weeks in the official newspaper of the county or counties in which the land and water areas are located. The notice must set forth the substance of the proposed action and must include a legal description of the proposed acquisitions. The board of county commissioners shall make its recommendations by certified mail with return receipt within sixty days after receipt of an acquisition proposal.

A detailed impact analysis from the federal agency involved must be included with the acquisition proposal for board of county commissioner consideration in making recommendations. The analysis must include the recreational and wildlife impacts. In addition, the county agent of the affected county or counties shall prepare an impact analysis for board of county commissioner consideration which must include the fiscal, social, and agricultural impacts of the proposed acquisitions. The department of the interior shall reimburse the county or counties for any expenses incurred by the county agent in preparing the analysis. The analyses must also be forwarded to the department of commerce division of community services, which shall furnish copies to all interested state agencies and political subdivisions, which agencies and political subdivisions have thirty days to review the analyses and return their comments to the division of community services. Upon expiration of the thirty-day period, all comments received by the division of community services must be forwarded to the federal agency involved and to the state official or agency responsible for final acquisition approval. The federal agency may, after consideration of the comments, file a final impact analysis with the governor, the board of county commissioners, and any other state official or agency responsible for final acquisition approval.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 204, § 2; 1991, ch. 231, § 29; 1999, ch. 475, § 2; 2001, ch. 488, § 9.

20.1-02-18.2.
Negotiation of leases, easements, and servitudes for wildlife production purposes.

A landowner may negotiate the terms of a lease, easement, or servitude for land, wetland, or water areas sought to be acquired by the United States department of the interior, its bureaus or agencies, with moneys from the migratory bird conservation fund [16 U.S.C. 718d] for use as waterfowl production areas, wildlife refuges, or for other wildlife purposes. A landowner may:

Negotiate the time period of the lease, easement, or servitude being sought; however, the duration of an easement for a waterfowl production area acquired by the federal government, and consented to by the governor or appropriate state agency after July 1, 1985, may not exceed fifty years.

Restrict a lease, easement, or servitude by legal description to the land, wetland, or water areas being sought, and may drain any after-expanded wetland or water area in excess of the legal description in the lease, easement, or servitude.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 204, § 3; 1981, ch. 258, § 1; 1985, ch. 274, § 3; 1985, ch. 275, § 1.

20.1-02-18.3.
Suspension of federal authority to acquire interests in land.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20.1-02-18, or any other provision of law, the United States may not acquire by any means any land or interests in land for migratory bird reservations, and the governor may not approve the acquisition of any land or interests in land with moneys from the migratory bird conservation fund until December 31, 1985, or until the date a management plan for such land is approved by both the legislative assembly and the governor, whichever date is first. The management plan must be jointly prepared by the secretary of the interior and the governor and shall address the extent and general locations of all proposed acquisitions with moneys from the migratory bird conservation fund, the management of all such lands whether already acquired or to be acquired, and the relationship of such acquisitions to mitigation acquisitions for federally financed or permitted projects.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 258, § 2; 1983, ch. 267, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Waterfowl Production Areas: A State Perspective, 60 N.D. L. Rev. 659 (1984).

20.1-02-18.4.
Wetlands mediation advisory board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 211, § 1.

20.1-02-18.5.
Wetlands mediation advisory board — Meetings — Staff — Compensation and expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 211, § 1.

20.1-02-18.6.
Wetlands mediation advisory board — Petition — Mediation — Hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 211, § 1.

20.1-02-19.
Removal proceedings — Game and fish hearing board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 236, § 1.

20.1-02-20.
Time of hearing — Notice of hearing and of determination. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 236, § 1.

20.1-02-21.
Suspension pending hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 236, § 1.

20.1-02-22.
Appeal to district court. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 236, § 1.

20.1-02-23.
Game and fish advisory board — Appointment — Qualifications — Term.

The state game and fish advisory board consists of eight members, one from each of the following districts, appointed by the governor:

District one shall consist of the counties of Divide, McKenzie, and Williams.

District two shall consist of the counties of Bottineau, Burke, McHenry, Mountrail, Pierce, Renville, and Ward.

District three shall consist of the counties of Benson, Cavalier, Eddy, Ramsey, Rolette, and Towner.

District four shall consist of the counties of Grand Forks, Nelson, Pembina, and Walsh.

District five shall consist of the counties of Cass, Ransom, Richland, Sargent, Steele, and Traill.

District six shall consist of the counties of Barnes, Dickey, Foster, Griggs, LaMoure, Logan, McIntosh, Stutsman, and Wells.

District seven shall consist of the counties of Burleigh, Emmons, Grant, Kidder, McLean, Mercer, Morton, Oliver, Sheridan, and Sioux.

District eight shall consist of the counties of Adams, Billings, Bowman, Dunn, Golden Valley, Hettinger, Slope, and Stark.

Four members must be bona fide farmers or ranchers and four members must be bona fide sportsmen. Each farmer or rancher appointment must be made from a list of three names submitted by agricultural organizations requested by the governor to submit the list and each sportsman appointment must be made from a list of three names submitted by outdoor, sportsmen, wildlife, and conservation organizations requested by the governor to submit the list. Appointments are for a term of four years from the first day of July of the year of expiration of the basic term, and until a successor has been appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring other than by the expiration of an appointive term may be filled by appointment for the remainder of the term only. No member of the board may serve longer than two full terms. The members of the advisory board are subject to removal by the governor for cause only. The advisory board shall select from their members a chairman, vice chairman, and secretary who serve in these positions until June thirtieth of the year next following their selection.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1979, ch. 301, § 1; 1991, ch. 237, § 1.

Cross-References.

Governor’s power to appoint majority of members of board, see N.D.C.C. § 54-07-01.2.

20.1-02-24.
Compensation.

Each member of the advisory board is entitled to be paid a per diem of sixty-two dollars and fifty cents for each day of service in going to, attending, and returning from the meetings required by section 20.1-02-25 to be held in that person’s respective district and the meetings of the advisory board. Each member is entitled to be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses at the rates and in the manner provided by law for other state officers. The compensation and expenses must be paid out of department appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1979, ch. 301, § 2; 1991, ch. 237, § 2; 2005, ch. 211, § 1.

Cross-References.

Travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-05.1, 54-06-09.

20.1-02-25.
Meetings and duties.

Each board member shall hold a public meeting at least twice each fiscal year in the board member’s respective district to make presentations and to determine the needs and the opinions of those interested in these activities. The board shall meet at least twice each fiscal year. The board has the authority to advise the director regarding any policy of hunting, fishing, and trapping regulations, and may make general recommendations concerning the operation of the department and its programs that the director may carry out. The board shall forward copies of its recommendations to the governor. This section does not limit or restrict the powers, duties, and authority of the governor in the issuance of orders and proclamations as provided in chapter 20.1-08.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1977, ch. 205, § 1; 1979, ch. 301, § 3; 1991, ch. 231, § 32; 1991, ch. 237, § 3.

20.1-02-26.
Mounted bighorn sheep trophy heads and horns — Plugging or tagging required — Rules.

Any person who brings into this state any mounted trophy head or horns, has any trophy head or horns mounted in this state, or comes into possession of any horns of dall sheep, stone sheep, desert bighorn sheep, or Rocky Mountain bighorn sheep shall have the trophy head or horns plugged or tagged by the department. A trophy head or horns plugged or tagged in the state, province or territory of Canada, or in Mexico where the sheep was taken satisfies the requirements of this section. The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 235, § 1.

20.1-02-27.
Public access program — Private landowner assistance to promote public hunting access.

The director may establish programs for landowner assistance that encourage public access to private lands for purposes of hunting.

Rules adopted by the director to implement this section may address:

A hunter management program consisting of a cooperative agreement between landowners and the department, and including other resource management agencies when appropriate, that allows public hunting with certain restrictions or use rules.

A hunting access enhancement program consisting of incentives for private landowners who allow public hunting access on their land.

Development of similar efforts outside the scope of the program that are designed to promote public access to private lands for hunting purposes.

The director may not structure a program in a manner that provides assistance to a private landowner who charges a fee for hunting access to private land that is enrolled in the program or who does not provide reasonable public hunting access to private land that is enrolled in the program. The director shall develop criteria by which tangible benefits are allocated to participating landowners, and the director may distribute the benefits to participating landowners. Benefits must be provided to offset potential impacts associated with public hunting access, including those associated with general ranch maintenance, conservation efforts, weed control, fire protection, liability insurance, roads, fences, and parking area maintenance.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 210, § 2.

20.1-02-28.
Deerproof hay yard program.

Within legislative appropriations, the director shall provide for a deerproof hay yard program. The deerproof hay yard program must provide materials and supplies at no cost and construction cost-share assistance to landowners for the establishment of deerproof hay yards to protect crops, hay, or feed on private property with deer depredation problems. A landowner who allows commercial hunting for big game on a majority of acres owned and operated in exchange for compensation and who posts a majority of the acres owned and operated by that person to prohibit big game hunting is not eligible to participate in the deerproof hay yard program. The department shall establish a prorated repayment system over a three-year period. For winter management program purposes of this section, a person may not willfully hunt, harass, chase, pursue, take, attempt to take, possess, transport, ship, convey by common carrier, sell, barter, or exchange a deer except as provided in carrying out practices to alleviate depredations under the private land habitat and access improvement program and elsewhere in this title.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 222, § 1; 2005, ch. 212, § 1; 2011, ch. 173, § 4; 2015, ch. 176, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

20.1-02-29.
Protection of personal information of the public.

The following records, regardless of form or characteristic, of or relating to the game and fish department are exempt under section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota:

A record that would identify the name, address, or electronic mail address of an individual participating in a wildlife harvest survey.

A record that would identify population distributions or locations of pallid sturgeon, bighorn sheep, moose, elk, eagles, sage grouse, prairie chickens, and any species of wildlife listed as threatened or endangered under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 [Pub. L. 93-205; 87 Stat. 884; 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.], as amended.

Telemetry radio frequencies or global positioning system coordinates of monitored species, denning sites, nest locations of raptors, and the specific location of wildlife capture sites used for wildlife research or management.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 213, § 1.

20.1-02-30.
Private land open to sportsmen program — Biomass demonstration project.

The department may develop and make available, as part of the broader support for establishment cost-share provided through the industrial commission, a special demonstration component of the private land open to sportsmen program to support perennial grass stand establishment of participating acres in return for public access to hunting and adherence to conservation best practices, including postseason harvest, minimum stubble height, and nonannual harvest. The demonstration project may include an evaluation component to assess the effects and compatibility of perennial biomass harvest with the habitat and public access objectives of the private land open to sportsmen program.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 462, § 1.

20.1-02-31.
Deer reduction programs.

The director or the director’s designee may authorize an individual to euthanize injured, sick, or emaciated deer under conditions determined by the director. The director may authorize targeted deer reduction programs to alleviate deer depredation.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 173, § 5.

20.1-02-32.
Canada goose depredation kill permits.

The department shall implement a web-based online application process for Canada goose kill permits, publicize in select agricultural publications and trade journals the availability of Canada goose kill permits, and implement a program to match volunteers with agricultural producers with kill permits.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 193, § 1.